Missouri, session 2026, SB1316.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 162, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 162.1550, to read as
follows:
162.1550. 1. As used in this section, "diversity-
equity-inclusion" or "DEI" shall mean education or training
requirements, policies, or programs on the subjects of
antiracism, implicit bias, or any other related instructions
or that promote differential treatment based on race,
gender, religion, ethnicity, and sexual preference, but not
including equal opportunity or equal employment opportunity
instruction designed to inform individuals about the
prohibition on discrimination based on protected class under
state and federal law.
2. A public school district or public charter school
shall not:
(1) Require students to agree with any statement
ascribing to DEI ideologies or to answer any questions
relating to DEI ideologies;

SB 1316 2
(2) Require or consider any student's statements on
DEI ideologies when determining a student's grades or
academic advancement;
(3) Offer or provide students with any incentive,
benefit, grant, or other compensation for taking any
coursework related to DEI ideologies or otherwise for
participating in any activities related to DEI ideologies if
such incentive, benefit, grant, or other compensation is not
equally available to students taking any coursework or
participating in any activity that is not related to DEI
ideologies;
(4) Require employees, or prospective employees, who
are involved with the instruction of students to agree with
any statement ascribing to DEI ideologies or to answer any
questions relating to DEI ideologies in any job application
or interview or during the course of the individual's
employment;
(5) Reward or give any advantage to any employee or
applicant for any statement advocating DEI ideologies in any
employment-related decisions, including, but not limited to,
compensation, terms, conditions or privileges of employment,
hiring, promotions, and tenure;
(6) Offer or provide any employees, or prospective
employees, who are involved with the instruction of students
with any incentive, benefit, grant, or other compensation
for receiving any instruction, including any professional
development materials, related to DEI ideologies or
otherwise for participating in any activities related to DEI
ideologies if such incentive, benefit, grant, or other
compensation is not equally available to any employees, or
prospective employees, who are involved with the instruction
of students and who are receiving any instruction, including

SB 1316 3
any professional development materials, or participating in
any activity that is not related to DEI ideologies; or
(7) Require employees, contractors, volunteers,
vendors, or agents to ascribe to, study, or be instructed
with DEI ideologies or materials.
3. The attorney general or the prosecuting or circuit
attorney in the county in which an alleged violation of this
section occurs may bring a civil action, including an action
for injunctive relief, against a public school district or
public charter school for any violation of the provisions of
this section. Such action shall be brought in the county
where the violation is alleged to have occurred.
4. An attorney acting on behalf of a school district
or public charter school may request a legal opinion of the
attorney general as to whether a particular training
material or instructional or curricular material complies
with the provisions of this section.
5. Any parent of a student enrolled in a school
district or charter school may bring a civil action,
including an action for injunctive relief or for damages,
against the school district or charter school in which their
child is enrolled for any violation of this section which
causes harm to their child. Such action shall be brought in
the county where the violation occurred. If the parent
prevails, the court shall award to such parent court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees and any other damages or
remedy which in the judgment of the court shall be
appropriate.
✓